Georgia statutes. TITLE 30 Handicapped Persons
CHAPTER 4 Rights of Persons with Disabilities

Cross references.

Hearing screenings for newborns, § 31-1-3.2.

30-4-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Housing accommodations” means any real property or portion thereof which is used or occupied, or intended, arranged, or designed to be used or occupied, as the home, residence, or sleeping place of one or more human beings but shall not include any single-family residence the occupants of which rent, lease, or furnish for compensation not more than one room therein.

“Physically disabled person” means any person, regardless of age, who is subject to a physiological defect or deficiency regardless of its cause, nature, or extent that renders the person unable to move about without the aid of crutches, a wheelchair, or any other form of support, or that limits the person’s functional ability to ambulate, climb, descend, sit, rise, or to perform any related function.

History.

Code 1981, §

30-4-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1350, § 1.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1350, § 1, redesignated former Code Section 30-4-1 as present Code Section 30-4-2.

30-4-2.
Right to equal public accommodations; right to be accompanied by guide dog or service dog.

Blind persons, persons with visual disabilities, persons with physical disabilities, and deaf persons are entitled to full and equal accommodations, advantages, facilities, and privileges on all common carriers, airplanes, motor vehicles, railroad trains, motor buses, streetcars, boats, or any other public conveyances or modes of transportation and at hotels, lodging places, places of public accommodation, amusement, or resort, and other places to which the general public is invited, subject only to the conditions and limitations established by law and applicable alike to all persons.

Every totally or partially blind person shall have the right to be accompanied by a guide dog, and every physically disabled person and every deaf person shall have the right to be accompanied by a service dog, especially trained for the purpose, in any of the places listed in subsection (a) of this Code section without being required to pay an extra charge for the guide or service dog; provided, however, that he or she shall be liable for any damage done to the premises or facilities by such dog. In addition, if such totally or partially blind person, physically disabled person, or deaf person is a student at a private or public school in this state, such person shall have the right to be accompanied by a guide dog or service dog subject to liability for damage as provided in the preceding sentence. The guide dog or service dog must be identified as having been trained by a school for seeing eye, hearing, service, or guide dogs.

Every person engaged in the training of a guide dog or service dog for the purpose of accompanying a person as provided in paragraph (1) of this subsection shall have the same right to be accompanied by such dog being trained as the totally or partially blind person, deaf person, or physically disabled person has under paragraph (1) of this subsection, so long as such trainer is identified as an agent or employee of a school for seeing eye, hearing, service, or guide dogs.

Every person engaged in the raising of a dog for training as a guide dog or service dog for the purpose of accompanying a person as provided in paragraph (1) of this subsection shall have the same right to be accompanied by such dog being raised for training as the totally or partially blind person, deaf person, or physically disabled person has under paragraph (1) of this subsection, so long as:

Such dog is being held on a leash and is under the control of the person raising such dog for an accredited school for seeing eye, hearing, service, or guide dogs;

Such person has on his or her person and available for inspection credentials from the accredited school for which the dog is being raised; and

Such dog is wearing a collar, leash, or other appropriate apparel or device that identifies such dog with the accredited school for which such dog is being raised.

Every totally or partially blind person operating a vending stand shall have the right to be accompanied by a trained guide dog on the entire premises of his or her vending operation.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 155, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1639, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 1131, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 616, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1405, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 10, § 30; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1302, § 16; Ga. L. 1998, p. 512, § 1; Code 1981, §

30-4-2

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1350, § 1; Ga. L. 2007, p. 316, § 1/HB 366.

Cross references.

Duty of operators of motor vehicles to yield right of way to blind pedestrians, §

40-6-94

.

Reservation of special parking places for persons with disabilities, §

40-6-220

et seq.

Duty of carriers to receive passengers, §§

46-9-130

,

46-9-131

.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1995, “persons with visual disabilities” was substituted for “visually persons with disabilities” near the beginning of subsection (a).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1350, § 1, redesignated former Code Section 30-4-2 as present Code Section 30-4-3.

30-4-3.
Right to housing accommodations.

Blind persons, visually disabled persons, physically disabled persons, and deaf persons shall be entitled to rent, lease, or purchase, as other members of the general public, all housing accommodations offered for rent, lease, or other compensation in this state, subject to the conditions and limitations established by law and applicable alike to all persons.

Every totally or partially blind person, every physically disabled person, and every deaf person who has a guide dog or service dog or who obtains a guide dog or service dog and every person engaged in the training of a guide dog or service dog shall be entitled to full and equal access to all housing accommodations provided for in this Code section, and he or she shall not be required to pay extra compensation for such guide dog or service dog. However, he or she shall be liable for any damage done to the premises by such guide dog or service dog.

Nothing in this Code section shall require any person renting, leasing, or otherwise providing real property for compensation to modify his or her property in any way or provide a higher degree of care for a blind, visually disabled, physically disabled, or deaf person than for a person who is not so disabled.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 155, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1639, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 1131, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1302, § 14; Ga. L. 1996, p. 665, § 2; Ga. L. 1998, p. 512, § 2; Code 1981, §

30-4-3

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1350, § 1.

Cross references.

Discrimination in sale, lease, financing, of housing (state policy on fair housing) generally, §

8-3-200

et seq.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1350, § 1, redesignated former Code Section 30-4-3 as present Code Section 30-4-4.

30-4-4.
Denial of or interference with admittance to or enjoyment of facilities or exercise of rights.

Any person, firm, corporation, or the agent of any person, firm, or corporation who denies or interferes with admittance to or enjoyment of the facilities enumerated in this chapter or otherwise interferes with the rights of a totally or partially blind person, physically disabled person, or deaf person or person engaged in the training or raising of a guide dog or service dog as provided by this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor of a high and aggravated nature and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine not to exceed $2,000.00, imprisonment for not more than 30 days, or both.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 155, § 2; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1639, § 2; Ga. L. 1980, p. 1131, § 2; Code 1981, §

30-4-4

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1350, § 1; Ga. L. 2007, p. 316, § 2/HB 366.

Law reviews.

For note, “No Pets Allowed:
The Need to Address Increasing Abuses of Assistance Animal Regulations Under Federal Law,” see 36 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 939 (2020).

30-4-5.
Prohibition on discrimination against legally blind in matters of child custody, guardianship, foster care, visitation, placement, and adoption; regulation.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Department” means the Department of Human Services.

“Legally blind” means:

Having vision that is 20/200 or less in the best corrected eye; or

Having vision that subtends an angle of not greater than 20 degrees in the best corrected eye.

“Supportive parenting services” means services that may assist a legally blind parent or prospective legally blind parent in the effective use of nonvisual techniques and other alternative methods to enable the parent or prospective legally blind parent to successfully discharge parental responsibilities.

Neither a court, the department, nor a child-placing agency shall deny a party child placement, child custody, visitation, guardianship, foster care, or adoption solely because the party is legally blind, but may consider such factors as provided in paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of Code Section 19-9-3.

Where a parent or prospective parent’s disability of being legally blind is alleged to have a detrimental impact on a child, the party raising the allegation shall bear the burden of proving by a preponderance of the evidence that the parent’s or prospective parent’s disability of being legally blind is endangering or will likely endanger the health, safety, or welfare of the child. If this burden is met, such parent or prospective parent shall have the opportunity to demonstrate how the implementation of supportive parenting services can alleviate parental care concerns, and the court may require such services with an opportunity to review the continuation of such services within a reasonable period of time.

Where a court determines that a legally blind parent’s right to custody, visitation, foster care, guardianship, or adoption should be denied or limited in any manner, the court shall make specific findings stating the basis for such a determination and why the provision of supportive parenting services is not a reasonable accommodation to prevent such denial or limitation.

The department shall promulgate rules or regulations not later than December 31, 2019, implementing the provisions of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

30-4-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 459, § 2/HB 79.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective May 2, 2019.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2019, p. 459, § 1/HB 79, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “(a)
The Georgia General Assembly finds that:

“(1)
Blind individuals continue to face unfair societal biases regarding their ability to successfully provide parental care;

“(2)
Blind individuals face unfair societal biases in family and dependency law proceedings, public and private adoption, guardianship, and foster care proceedings;

“(3)
Children of blind individuals are being unnecessarily removed or restricted from parental care; and

“(4)
Children are being denied the opportunity to enjoy loving homes with blind parents or other blind caretakers.

“(b)
The purpose of this Act is to protect the best interests of children parented by blind individuals or children who could be parented by blind individuals through the establishment of procedural safeguards that require adherence to due process and equal protection rights of blind parents in the context of child welfare, foster care, adoption, and family law.”